Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202514-217.01
Mayor; election; term.

Each city of the metropolitan class shall elect a mayor as provided in section 32-536 whose term of office shall coincide with the terms of city council members elected concurrently to the city council.

Laws 1979, LB 329, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 9.